Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 38-904, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-904. Death benefits; amount A. If an active or inactive member dies and no pension is payable on account of the member's death, an amount equal to two times the member's accumulated contributions to the retirement plan is payable to the person designated by the deceased member in writing and filed with the board.  If the designated person or persons do not survive the deceased member or if the designated person does not claim the benefit, the payment is payable, at the election of the local board, to the designated person's nearest of kin as determined by the local board or to the estate of the deceased member. The beneficiary or person who is claiming to be the nearest of kin shall file a written application in order to receive the refund.  For the purposes of this subsection, "inactive member" means a person who previously made contributions to the plan, who has not retired, who is not currently making contributions to the plan and who has not withdrawn contributions from the plan. B. If the deceased retired or active member does not have an eligible surviving spouse or the pension of the eligible surviving spouse is terminated, each eligible child is entitled to a child's pension.  A child's pension terminates if the child is adopted.  In the case of a child with a disability, the child's pension terminates if the child ceases to be under a disability or ceases to be a dependent of the surviving spouse or guardian.  The amount of the pension of each eligible child is an equal share of the amount of the surviving spouse's pension. The board shall pay the pension of the surviving minor or child's child with a disability pension to the person who is the legally appointed guardian or custodian of the eligible child until the eligible child reaches eighteen years of age, at which time the eligible child's pension shall be paid directly to the eligible child if the person remains eligible to receive the pension and is not subject to a guardianship or conservatorship due to disability or incapacity.  The pension of a child with a disability who is eighteen years of age or older and who is subject to a guardianship or conservatorship due to disability or incapacity shall continue to be paid to the guardian or conservator if the child remains eligible for the pension payment. END_STATUTE